Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2624 (3) 91 as/js/md H.F. 2624 Section 1. Section 81.1, subsection 12, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 12. âPerson required to submit a DNA sampleâ means a person 3 arrested, convicted, adjudicated delinquent, receiving a 4 deferred judgment, or found not guilty by reason of insanity 5 of an offense requiring DNA profiling pursuant to section 6 81.2 . âPerson required to submit a DNA sampleâ also means a 7 person determined to be a sexually violent predator pursuant 8 to section 229A.7 . 9 Sec. 2. Section 81.2, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 1. A person who is arrested for a felony or violent 12 aggravated misdemeanor or who receives a deferred judgment for 13 a felony or against whom a judgment or conviction for a felony 14 or aggravated misdemeanor has been entered shall be required to 15 submit a DNA sample for DNA profiling pursuant to section 81.4 . 16 For purposes of this section, only a person arrested for a 17 felony or a violent aggravated misdemeanor shall be required to 18 submit a DNA sample upon arrest. 19 5. An offender placed on probation shall immediately report 20 to the judicial district department of correctional services 21 after sentencing so it can be determined if the offender 22 has been arrested or convicted of an offense requiring DNA 23 profiling. If it is determined by the judicial district that 24 DNA profiling is required, the offender shall immediately 25 submit a DNA sample. 26 Sec. 3. Section 81.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 27 following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A sample is not required pursuant to 29 this section if it is determined that a sample has previously 30 been taken, is in the possession of the DNA database or DNA 31 data bank established pursuant to section 81.3, and has not 32 been expunged pursuant to section 81.9. 33 Sec. 4. Section 81.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -1- HF 2624 (3) 91 as/js/md 1/ 3 H.F. 2624 81.9 Expungement of DNA records. 1 1. A person whose DNA record has been included in the DNA 2 database or DNA data bank established pursuant to section 3 81.3 may request, in writing to the division of criminal 4 investigation, expungement of the DNA record from the DNA 5 database and DNA data bank based upon the shall have the 6 personâs DNA record automatically expunged within thirty days 7 of the occurrence of either of the following: 8 a. The personâs conviction, adjudication, or civil 9 commitment which that caused the submission of the DNA sample 10 being reversed on appeal and the case dismissed. The written 11 request shall contain a certified copy of the final court order 12 reversing the conviction, adjudication, or civil commitment, 13 and a certified copy of the dismissal, and any other 14 information necessary to ascertain the validity of the request. 15 b. The personâs arrest that led to the inclusion of the DNA 16 sample in the DNA database or DNA data bank has resulted in an 17 aggravated misdemeanor or felony charge that has been resolved 18 by dismissal or acquittal, or the failure to file an aggravated 19 misdemeanor or felony charge within one year of arrest. 20 2. The division of criminal investigation, upon receipt of a 21 written request that validates reversal on appeal of a personâs 22 conviction, adjudication, or commitment, and subsequent 23 dismissal of the case, or upon receipt of a written request 24 by a person who voluntarily submitted a DNA sample pursuant 25 to section 81.3, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ being notified 26 that a personâs DNA record is eligible for expungement under 27 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ or âbâ , shall expunge all of the 28 DNA records and identifiable information of the person in the 29 DNA database and DNA data bank. However, if the division of 30 criminal investigation determines that the person is otherwise 31 obligated to submit a DNA sample, the DNA records shall not be 32 expunged. If the division of criminal investigation denies 33 an expungement request, the division shall notify the person 34 requesting the expungement of the decision not to expunge 35 -2- HF 2624 (3) 91 as/js/md 2/ 3 H.F. 2624 the DNA record and the reason supporting its decision. The 1 division of criminal investigation decision is subject to 2 judicial review pursuant to chapter 17A . The department of 3 public safety shall adopt rules governing the expungement 4 procedure and a review process. 5 3. The division of criminal investigation is not required 6 to expunge or destroy a DNA record pursuant to this section , 7 if expungement or destruction of the DNA record would destroy 8 evidence related to another person , or investigation . 9 -3- HF 2624 (3) 91 as/js/md 3/ 3